Hawaii statutes.
§88-153 Police officers,
firefighters, and bandsmen pension system; trustees, powers. There shall
be in every county a police officers, firefighters, and bandsmen pension system
which shall be governed and managed by a board of trustees. In each county the
board shall consist of three members, who shall be appointed by the mayor with
the approval of the county council in each instance. The terms of office of
the trustees first taking office shall expire as designated by the appointing
authority at the time of appointment, one after one year of service, one after
two years of service, and one after four years of service. The terms of
subsequent trustees shall be for four years and until their successors are
appointed and qualified except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy caused
by death, resignation, or otherwise, occurring prior to the expiration of the
term, shall be appointed for the remainder of the term. The appointing
authority shall designate one of the trustees as chairperson of the board in
each instance. No person shall be eligible for membership or be a member of
the board who occupies any elective or appointive office or position under the
county government, and no member shall, during the member's term of office,
serve as an officer or committee member of any political party organization, or
present oneself as candidate or be a candidate for nomination or election to
any public office in any primary or general election. The members of the board
of trustees shall serve without pay.

The board may take by gift, grant, devise or
bequest any money, choses in action, personal property, real estate, or any
interest in anything of value, under the name and style of "The board of
trustees of the police officers, firefighters, and bandsmen pension
system" of the county in which the board shall be created, and hold the
same or assign, transfer, or sell the same whenever proper or necessary under
and by such name.

Any county that does not have a constituency
for this pension system shall be exempt from these requirements. [L 1917, c
220, pts of §§1, 2; RL 1925, pts of §§2161, 2162; RL 1935, pts of §§7903, 7904;
am L 1939, c 86, pt of §1; RL 1945, pts of §§6171, 6172; RL 1955, §6-132; am L
1963, c 65, §2d, e, f; am imp L 1967, c 80, §1; HRS §88-153; am L 1983, c 124,
§15; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 1998, c 261, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next